Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
CHAPTER 350 Surface Coal Mining
350.055.
Publication of notice of intention to mine by permit applicant — Notification of various local government bodies by cabinet.

An applicant for a permit required by KRS

350.060

shall publish public notice of his filing of an application for that permit. The publication shall be made by advertisement in a newspaper of largest bona fide circulation, according to the definition in KRS

424.110

to

424.120

, in the county wherein the proposed mining site is located.

The applicant shall publish the notice of intention to mine in the newspaper identified in subsection (1) at least once a week for four (4) consecutive weeks beginning at the time of submission of an application for a surface coal mining operation permit, pursuant to regulations promulgated by the cabinet.

The public notice of the filing of an application shall be entitled “Notice of Intention to Mine” and shall be in a manner and form prescribed by the cabinet and shall include, though not be limited to, the following:

The name and address of the applicant;

The location, ownership, and boundaries of the proposed permit area.

A copy of the newspaper advertisement of the applicant’s “Notice of Intention to Mine” shall be filed with the cabinet and made a part of the complete application within a reasonable time after the last date of publication.

The cabinet shall notify various local government bodies, planning agencies, and sewage and water treatment authorities and water companies in the locality of the proposed operation notifying them of the applicant’s intention to mine the land area as set forth in the notice of intention to mine, and identifying the permit application number assigned by the cabinet and where a copy of the permit application may be inspected. The secretary shall promulgate regulations specifying the manner in which the agencies may comment on the application. Any comments put forward pursuant to this section shall immediately be forwarded by the cabinet to the applicant and shall be made available to the public at the same places as the permit application is available.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 322, § 1; 1980, ch. 62, § 4; 1980, ch. 377, § 1; 1992, ch. 429, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 2017 ch. 142, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

350.057.
Coal exploration operations.

The secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet shall promulgate regulations for the permitting and performance of coal exploration operations which substantially disturb the natural land surface. The regulations shall include at a minimum provisions for giving notice of intention to explore including a description of the area to be explored and the period of supposed exploration and provisions for reclamation, as required by this chapter, of all land disturbed in the exploration.

Any requirements of public access to records set forth in the Kentucky Revised Statutes to the contrary notwithstanding, the secretary shall order that confidential trade secrets or privileged commercial or financial information in the possession of the cabinet or pursuant to a coal exploration permit remain confidential.

No person or operator shall remove more than twenty-five (25) tons of coal by coal exploration operations without first obtaining a coal exploration permit from the cabinet.

No person or operator conducting coal exploration operations in which more than twenty-five (25) tons of coal are removed shall knowingly and willfully receive, transport, sell, convey, exchange, transfer, trade, donate, deliver, or otherwise convert to a commercial use any coal extracted during the course of the operations, except with the prior written approval of the cabinet for the purpose of testing or determining the properties of the coal.

All persons or operators conducting operations pursuant to this section shall be subject to the applicable provisions of KRS

350.990

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 62, § 6; 1990, ch. 205, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 212, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 2010, ch. 24, § 1878, effective July 15, 2010.

350.060.
Permit requirement — Contents of application — Fee — Bond — Administrative regulations — Successive renewal — Auger mining of previously mined area — Exempt operations.

No person shall engage in surface coal mining and reclamation operations without having first obtained from the cabinet a permit designating the area of land affected by the operation. Permits shall authorize the permittee to engage in surface coal mining and reclamation operations upon the area of land described in his application for a period not to exceed five (5) years. However, if an applicant demonstrates that a specified longer term is reasonably needed to obtain necessary financing for equipment and the opening of the operation and if the application is full and complete for the specified longer term, the cabinet may grant a permit for the longer term. No mining shall be permitted beyond the time period obligations of the initial or extended bond coverage.

Subject to the provisions of KRS 350.010(1) and (2), no person shall knowingly and willfully receive, transport, sell, convey, transfer, trade, exchange, donate, purchase, deliver, or in any way derive benefit from coal removed from any surface mining operation which does not have a permit as required under this section.

No permit or revision application shall be approved unless the application affirmatively demonstrates, and the cabinet finds in writing on the basis of the information set forth in the application or from information otherwise available, that the permit application is accurate and complete and that all the requirements of this chapter have been complied with.

A person desiring a permit to engage in surface coal mining operations shall file an application which shall state:

The location and area of land to be affected by the operation, with a description of access to the area from the nearest public highways;

The owner or owners of the surface of the area of land to be affected by the permit and the owner or owners of all surface area adjacent to any part of the affected area;

The owner or owners of the coal to be mined;

The source of the applicant’s legal right to mine the coal on the land affected by the permit;

The permanent and temporary post office addresses of the applicant, which shall be updated immediately if changed at any point prior to final bond release;

Whether the applicant or any person, partnership, or corporation associated with the applicant holds or has held any other permits under this chapter, and an identification of the permits;

The names and addresses of every officer, partner, director, or person performing a function similar to a director of the applicant, together with the names and addresses of any individual owning of record ten percent (10%) or more of any class of voting stock of the applicant, and whether the applicant or any person is subject to any of the provisions of subsection (3) of KRS

350.130

and he shall so certify. The permittee shall submit updates of this information as changes occur or as otherwise provided by administrative regulation; however, failure to submit updated information shall constitute a violation of this chapter only upon the permittee’s refusal or failure to timely submit the information to the cabinet upon request. Upon receipt of updated information satisfactory to the cabinet, the cabinet shall promptly update its computer system containing the information;

A listing of any violations of this chapter, Public Law 95-87, and any law, rule, or regulation in effect for the protection of air or water resources incurred by the applicant in connection with any surface coal mining and reclamation operation during the three (3) year period prior to the date of an application. The list shall indicate the final resolution of the violations; and

Whether the area of land to be affected by the operation has been previously mined and is in compliance with current reclamation standards, and, if not, identify the needed reclamation work.

The application for a permit shall be accompanied by an official document, and an affidavit attesting to the document’s authenticity, which will evidence what particular business entity the applicant is, whether a foreign or domestic corporation, a partnership, an entity doing business as another, or, if sole proprietorship, an affidavit so stating.

The application for a permit shall be accompanied by copies, in numbers satisfactory to the cabinet, of a United States Geological Survey topographic map or other map acceptable to the cabinet on which the applicant has indicated the location of the operation, the course which would be taken by drainage from the operation to the stream or streams to which the drainage would normally flow, the name of the applicant and date, and the name of the person who located the operation on the map.

The application for a permit shall be accompanied by copies, in numbers satisfactory to the cabinet, of an enlarged United States Geological Survey topographic map or other map acceptable to the cabinet meeting the requirements of paragraphs (a) to (i) of this subsection. The map shall:

Be prepared and certified by a professional engineer registered under the provisions of KRS Chapter 322. The certification shall be in the form as provided in subsection (8) of this section, except that the engineer shall not be required to certify the true ownership of property under paragraph (d) of this subsection;

Identify the area to correspond with the application;

Show adjacent deep mining;

Show the boundaries of surface properties and names of owners of the affected area and adjacent to any part of the affected area;

Be of a scale of 1:24,000 or larger;

Show the names and locations of all streams, creeks, or other bodies of public water, roads, buildings, cemeteries, oil and gas wells, and utility lines on the area of land affected within three hundred (300) feet of an as-drilled oil or gas well, but as-drilled locations of oil and gas wells shall be certified only by a licensed surveyor and the well locations shall be entered in coordinates in feet units, using NAD 83, with Single Zone Projection, as those terms are defined in KRS

350.010

;

Show by appropriate markings the boundaries of the area of land affected, the cropline of the seam or deposit of coal to be mined, and the total number of acres involved in the area of land affected;

Show the date on which the map was prepared, the north point, and the quadrangle name; and

Show the drainage plan on and away from the area of land affected. The plan shall indicate the directional flow of water, constructed drainways, natural waterways used for drainage, and the streams or tributaries receiving the discharge.

Each application shall include a determination of the probable hydrologic consequences of the mining and reclamation operations, both on and off the mine site, with respect to the hydrologic regime, quantity and quality of water in surface and groundwater systems, including the dissolved and suspended solids under seasonal flow conditions, and the collection of sufficient data for the mine site and surrounding areas so that an assessment can be made by the cabinet of the probable cumulative impacts of all anticipated mining in the area upon the hydrology of the area and particularly upon water availability. This determination shall not be required until the time hydrologic information on the general area prior to mining is made available from an appropriate federal or state agency. The permit shall not be approved until the information is available and is incorporated into the application.

All certifications required by this chapter to be made by professional engineers shall be done in the form prescribed by the cabinet and shall be reasonably specific as to the work being certified. The cabinet may reject any document or map as incomplete if it is not properly certified.

In addition to the information and maps required above, each application for a permit shall be accompanied by detailed plans or proposals showing the method of operation; the manner, time, and distance for backfilling; grading work; and a reclamation plan for the affected area, which proposals shall meet the requirements of this chapter and administrative regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

The application for a permit shall be accompanied by proof that the applicant has public liability insurance coverage satisfactory to the cabinet for the surface mining and reclamation operations for which the permit is sought, or proof that the applicant has satisfied self-insurance requirements as provided by administrative regulations of the cabinet. The coverage shall be maintained in full force and effect during the terms of the permit and any permit renewal, and until reclamation operations are completed.

A basic fee set by administrative regulation, and bearing a reasonable relationship to the cost of processing the permit application but not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), plus a fee set by administrative regulation but not to exceed seventy-five dollars ($75), for each acre or fraction thereof of the area of land to be affected by the operation, shall be paid before the permit required in this section shall be issued; provided that if the cabinet approves an incremental bonding plan submitted by the applicant, the acreage fees may be paid in increments and at times corresponding to the approved plan. The applicant shall file with the cabinet a bond payable to the Commonwealth of Kentucky with surety satisfactory to the cabinet in the sum to be determined by the cabinet for each acre or fraction thereof of the area of land affected, with a minimum bond of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), conditioned upon the faithful performance of the requirements set forth in this chapter and of the administrative regulations of the cabinet. The cabinet shall forfeit the entire amount of the bond for the permit area or increment in the event of forfeiture. In determining the amount of the bond, the cabinet shall take into consideration the character and nature of the overburden; the future suitable use of the land involved; the cost of backfilling, grading, and reclamation to be required; and the probable difficulty of reclamation, giving consideration to such factors as topography, geology, hydrology, and revegetation potential. The bond amount shall initially be computed to be sufficient to ensure completion of reclamation if the work had to be performed by the cabinet in the event of forfeiture. Within thirty (30) days of a cabinet determination of a need to change a bond protocol currently in use, the cabinet shall immediately promulgate administrative regulations setting forth bonding requirements, including but not limited to requirements for the amount, duration, release, and forfeiture of bonds. Bond protocols shall not be exempt from KRS

13A.100

and shall be established by promulgating administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A. Failure to include the formula for establishing the amount of the bond in any administrative regulation on bonding requirements shall be deemed a failure to comply with the prescriptions of this section and the administrative regulation shall automatically be declared deficient in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations for the permitting of operations with surface effects of underground mining and other surface coal mining and reclamation operations consistent with this section. The cabinet shall recognize the distinct differences between the surface effects of underground mining and strip mining, as also provided in KRS

350.151

, in promulgating permitting requirements for these operations.

Any valid permit issued pursuant to this chapter shall carry with it the right of successive renewal upon expiration with respect to areas within the boundaries of the existing permit. An applicant for renewal of a permit shall pay a basic fee set by regulation, not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750). The holders of the permit may apply for renewal and the renewal shall be issued, provided that on application for renewal the burden shall be on the opponents of renewal, subsequent to the fulfillment of the public notice requirements of this chapter, unless it is established and written findings by the cabinet are made that:

The terms and conditions of the existing permit are not being satisfactorily met;

The present surface coal mining and reclamation operation is not in compliance with the environmental protection standards of this chapter;

The renewal requested substantially jeopardizes the applicant’s continuing responsibility on existing permit areas;

The applicant has not provided evidence that the performance bond in effect for the operation will continue in full force and effect for any renewal requested in the application as well as any additional bond the cabinet might require; or

Any additional revised or updated information required by the cabinet has not been provided.

Prior to the approval of any renewal of permit, the cabinet shall provide notice to the appropriate public authorities.

If an application for renewal of a valid permit includes a proposal to extend the mining operation beyond the boundaries authorized in the existing permit, the portion of the application for renewal of a valid permit which addresses any new areas of surface disturbance shall be subject to the full standards applicable to new applications under this chapter.

Any permit renewal shall be for a term not to exceed the period of the original permit. Application for permit renewal shall be made at least one hundred twenty (120) days prior to the expiration of the valid permit.

Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this section, a permit shall terminate if the permittee has not commenced the surface coal mining operations covered by the permit within three (3) years of the issuance of the permit. However, the cabinet may grant reasonable extensions of time upon a showing that the extensions are necessary by reason of litigation precluding commencement of operations, or threatening substantial economic loss to the permittee, or by reason of conditions beyond the control and without the fault or negligence of the permittee. With respect to coal to be mined for use in a synthetic fuel facility or specific major electric generating facility, the permittee shall be deemed to have commenced surface mining operations at the time the construction of the synthetic fuel or generating facility is initiated.

Each application for a permit or revision for auger mining on a previously mined area shall contain information to describe the area to be affected, to show that the proposed method of operation will result in stable post-mining conditions, and reduce or eliminate adverse environmental conditions created by previous mining activities. If the cabinet determines that the affected area cannot be stabilized and reclaimed subsequent to augering or that the operation will result in an adverse impact to the proposed or adjacent area, the permit or revision shall not be issued. The cabinet shall, consistent with all applicable requirements of this chapter, issue a permit or revision if the applicant demonstrates that the proposed coal mining operations will provide for reduction or elimination of the highwall, or reduction or abatement of adverse impacts resulting from past mining activities, or stabilization or enhancement of a previously mined area. The cabinet shall insure that all reasonably available spoil material will be used to backfill the highwall to the extent practical and feasible; provided, however, that in all cases the holes be properly sealed and backfilled to a minimum of four (4) feet above the coal seam being mined.

All operations involving the loading of coal which do not separate the coal from its impurities, and which are not located at or near the mine site, shall be exempt from the requirements of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 8, § 6; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. VII, § 6; 1960, ch. 143, § 4; 1962, ch. 105, § 4; 1964, ch. 61, § 3; 1966, ch. 4, § 7; 1972, ch. 270, § 3; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 65; 1974, ch. 69, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(7); 1974, ch. 258, § 1; 1974, ch. 373, § 2; 1976, ch. 291, § 1; 1978, ch. 330, § 23, effective May 3, 1978; 1978, ch. 332, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 62, § 5, effective March 21, 1980; 1980, ch. 377, § 3, effective March 21, 1980; 1982, ch. 266, § 10, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 283, § 3, effective April 2, 1982; 1984, ch. 111, § 144, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 145, § 2, effective March 28, 1984; 1984, ch. 358, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 448, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 294, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 415, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 417, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 210, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 212, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 429, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 382, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 37, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 79, § 11, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 103, § 1, effective April 8, 2010; 2011, ch. 102, § 1, effective June 8, 2011; 2017 ch. 142, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

350.062.
Data included in permit application — Contemporaneous reclamation — Subsoil augmentation — Cabinet to compile hydrologic data — Abandoned land projects classified as government financed construction.

Applicants for permits may submit such hydrologic information on the general area prior to mining as may be made available by the cabinet pursuant to subsection (7) of this section and employ the information in any reasonable mathematical water modeling formulation, logical extrapolation from existing data on the same or similar watershed, or other reasonable predictive techniques which regionalize and synthetize historical, geologic, and hydrologic parameters on the general area to determine surface ground water conditions, together with site specific data in determining the probable hydrologic consequences of the proposed mining.

Climatological data, average seasonable precipitation, average direction and velocity of prevailing winds, or seasonable temperature ranges shall be submitted by the applicant only when requested by the cabinet on a site-by-site basis.

A statement of the result of test borings or core samplings from the permit area, including logs of the drill holes; the thickness of the coal seam found; an analysis of the chemical properties of the coal; the sulfur content of any coal seam to be disturbed; chemical analysis of potentially acid or toxic forming sections of the overburden; or chemical analysis of the stratum lying immediately underneath the coal seam to be mined, may be waived by the cabinet with respect to the specific application by a written determination that the requirements are unnecessary.

Applicants may submit fish and wildlife information within the proposed mine plan area and adjacent areas in the form of published data or data otherwise available from state and federal fish and wildlife management, conservation, or regulatory agencies and site-specific information unless the cabinet requires the information based on reasonable grounds to believe that the available data are inaccurate.

The cabinet shall provide in its regulations that notwithstanding a permittee’s detailed estimated timetable for the reclamation plan in the application, as long as the permittee or operator is in compliance with the contemporaneous reclamation requirements of its regulations, a failure to adhere to the timetable shall not be an independent basis for a violation.

The cabinet shall provide in its regulations establishing environmental protection performance standards that a permittee may augment subsoil strata with chemical or organic soil supplement materials produced on site or elsewhere for the purpose of complying with the topsoiling requirements of this chapter if topsoil is of insufficient quality or of poor quality for sustaining vegetation.

The cabinet shall compile by September 1, 1980, available background hydrologic information concerning the general areas in which surface coal mining has or may be conducted in the Commonwealth as may be available in standard published form, research reports, studies or data compiled by other state or federal agencies including state-supported colleges and universities, the cabinet’s own files, including, at a minimum, quality and quantity of water in surface and ground water systems; minimum, maximum, and average discharge quantities at peak and critical low flow and seasonal variations; dissolved and suspended solids, acidity, pH, iron, and manganese under seasonal flow conditions; and any other background hydrologic information required by the cabinet concerning the hydrologic regime of a general area prior to mining for purposes of making a determination of the probable consequences of the mining; and shall make available to an operator the data and information concerning general areas within ten (10) days of a request in writing.

The cabinet shall classify all abandoned mine land program reclamation projects as government financed construction and not surface coal mining operations and the extraction of coal as an incidental part of the projects shall be exempt from the requirements of this chapter and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

The cabinet shall not arbitrarily deny or unreasonably delay any permit application based upon the information required in this section if the registered professional engineer or geologist or other qualified person has utilized or developed a procedure or analytical method that differs from departmental technical guidelines; provided, that the registered professional engineer or geologist or other qualified person shall design a sampling and testing program based on all available information and on a site-specific basis. The reasons for denial shall be given in writing and shall be reasonably specific. The requirements contained in subsection (3) of this section may be waived for locations where the cabinet determines that adequate information is already available to the cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 209, § 2; 1982, ch. 283, § 4, effective April 2, 1982; 1992, ch. 429, § 6, effective July 14, 1992.

350.063.
Duty of applicant to meet and confer with well operator if permit will disturb access roads.

Prior to the issuance of a permit, if the operation will disturb any roads used as access to an oil or gas well or other oil and gas facility, the permit applicant shall certify that he has met and conferred with, or offered to meet and confer with, the well operator as to the disturbance.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 348, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

350.064.
Reclamation bond to be filed by applicant.

After a surface coal mining and reclamation permit application has been approved but before the permit is issued, the applicant shall file with the regulatory authority, on a form prescribed and furnished by the regulatory authority, a reclamation bond for performance payable, as appropriate, to the state, and conditional upon faithful performance of all the requirements of this chapter and the permit. The reclamation bond shall cover that area of land within the permit area upon which the applicant will initiate and conduct surface coal mining and reclamation operations within the initial term of the permit. As succeeding increments of surface coal mining and reclamation operations are to be initiated and conducted within the permit area, the permittee shall file with the cabinet an additional bond or bonds to cover the increments in accordance with this section.

The cabinet may approve an alternative system that will achieve the objectives and purposes of the bonding program pursuant to this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 209, § 4; 1988, ch. 417, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 429, § 7, effective July 14, 1992; 2018 ch. 85, § 3, effective July 14, 2018.

350.066.
Bond posting not required until permit application approved.

All bonds required to be filed in accordance with KRS

350.060

and

350.064

shall not be required to be filed until the applicant for the permit has been notified in writing by the cabinet that the application for the permit has been approved, with the exception of the bond.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 55, § 1, effective March 9, 1982.

350.068.
Cancellation of surety.

A surety upon receipt of a copy of a notice of noncompliance for failure to maintain contemporaneous reclamation issued to its insured, may notify the insured by certified mail, return receipt requested, that surety on any area disturbed after thirty (30) days from the effective date of the surety’s notice may be refused unless the violation is abated. A copy of such notice shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the cabinet, and shall become effective upon approval by the cabinet. Within thirty (30) days of receipt of a notice of cancellation, the cabinet shall either accept a suitable substitute bond for the canceled area or shall amend the permit to delete the unbonded acreage or shall revoke the permit for lack of a bond. Proof of the abatement shall be documented by notice to the surety from the cabinet. Nothing contained herein shall be construed to relieve the surety of its liability for areas disturbed within the thirty (30) day notice period. The surety shall remain obligated for the full extent of the bond for reclamation of all areas disturbed prior to the cabinet’s approval of the cancellation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 281, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.

350.069.
Stringency of regulations.

To make the state program no more stringent than the federal program, effective October 1, 1984, the cabinet shall, within thirty (30) days of publication of final rulemaking in the Federal Register, promulgate those regulations that are consistent with and no less effective than the federal regulations promulgated pursuant to Public Law 95-87, the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 and by having such regulations in full force and effect within sixty (60) days thereafter unless a public hearing is requested. In the event a public hearing is held, the regulations shall be implemented within thirty (30) days after the hearing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 190, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.

350.070.
Permit revisions.

Any extensions of the area covered by the permit, except incidental boundary revisions, shall be made by application for another permit or an amendment to the permit.

For an amendment, the permittee shall file an application, map, and revised reclamation plan in the same form and with the same content as required for an original application under this chapter. He or she shall pay a basic fee set by regulation and bearing a reasonable relationship to the cost of processing the permit application, not to exceed one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($1,750), plus a fee set by regulation, not to exceed seventy-five dollars ($75), for each acre or fraction of an acre for the increase requested. He or she shall file with the cabinet a supplemental bond in the amount to be determined under the provisions of KRS 350.060(11) for each acre or fraction of an acre of the increase approved. This application shall be subject to all of the same requirements as an original application, including, but not limited to, the same public notice, review, and issuance or denial provisions.

If the cabinet approves a reduction in the acreage covered by the permit, it shall release the bond for each acre reduced, but the bond shall not be reduced below ten thousand dollars ($10,000). If the cabinet approves a reduction in acreage, it shall transfer the acreage fee for each acre reduced to acreage fees for subsequent permit applications by the permittee.

The cabinet shall promulgate regulations specifying the permit application information requirements and procedures, including notice and hearing, which shall apply depending on the scale or extent of a permit revision. Any revision which proposes significant alterations in the reclamation plan shall be subject to the notice and hearing requirements as set forth in the regulations of the cabinet. The applicant for a revision shall pay a basic fee set by regulation, not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) for a minor revision and one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($1,750) for a major revision, plus a fee set by regulation not to exceed seventy-five dollars ($75), for each acre or fraction of an acre included in an incidental boundary revision.

Incidental boundary revisions shall be deemed minor revisions if they:

Do not exceed ten percent (10%) of the initial permit acreage;

Are contiguous with the permit acreage;

Are within the same watershed as the initial permit acreage;

Are required for an orderly continuation of the mining operation;

Cover the same coal seam or seams as in the permit;

Would only involve lands for which the hydrologic and geologic data and the probable hydrologic consequences analysis contained in the permit are applicable to the proposed incidental boundary revision;

Would not involve properties designated as unsuitable for mining, or any properties eligible for listing on the National Register of Historic Places;

Would not involve any of the special categories of mining listed in 30 C.F.R. Part 785 including, but not limited to, prime farmland and coal preparation plants, unless the approved permit already includes the relevant category;

Would not constitute a change in the method of mining; and

Would be reclaimed in conformity with the initial reclamation plan.

For the purpose of this section, the maximum acreage allowed to be added by an incidental boundary revision shall be as follows:

Surface operations shall be allowed up to twenty (20) acres;

Surface disturbances of underground mines including, but not limited to, face-up areas and haul roads, shall be allowed up to twenty (20) acres; and

The cumulative acreage added by successive revisions shall not exceed the above limitations.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 8, § 7; 1962, ch. 105, § 5; 1966, ch. 4, § 11; 1972, ch. 270, § 4; 1974, ch. 69, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(7); 1978, ch. 330, § 24, effective May 3, 1978; 1978, ch. 332, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 62, § 7; 1990, ch. 210, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 232, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 308, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 429, § 8, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 301, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2010, ch. 103, § 2, effective April 8, 2010; 2018 ch. 85, § 4, effective July 14, 2018.

350.075.
Special permits for remining of previously affected areas — Administrative regulations.

In order to bring about a more desirable land use or promote the public interest and the environment, the cabinet may, at its discretion, issue special permits for the remining of previously affected areas, including but not limited to, secondary coal recovery operations, such as coal extraction from coal refuse piles and coal recovery from slurry ponds. Such permits may provide for alternate requirements for revegetation, topsoil, bonding, premining data collection requirements, water quality requirements where there are pre-existing pollutional discharges resulting from previous mining, and other provisions which may encourage remining and secondary coal recovery.

The cabinet is hereby authorized to promulgate administrative regulations as necessary in order to implement the provisions of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 266, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2006, ch. 37, § 2, effective July 12, 2006.

350.080.
Procedure for obtaining approval of other mining operations — Deferral of reclamation.

A permittee may conduct other mining operations from premises covered by a strip mining permit with approval of the cabinet, subject to the provisions of KRS Chapters 351 and 352. In applying to the cabinet for the approval, he shall furnish the cabinet with a revised copy of the map of the area on which his permit was based on which he shall designate other mining locations, the location of outside haulageways, and other parts of the area necessary to the conduct of other mining operations. The cabinet may authorize the permittee to defer the reclamation of the area covered by the operations during such time as other bona fide mining operations are carried out. The bond covering that area shall remain in effect until reclamation of it has been completed by the permittee under a plan approved by the cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 8, § 8; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 66; 1992, ch. 429, § 9, effective July 14, 1992.